playground.lexc
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

Multichar_Symbols
%<n%>                     ! Noun
%<prn%>                   ! Pronoun
%<ij%>                    ! Interjection
%<cnjcoo%>                ! Co-ordinating conjunction
%<cnjadv%>                ! Adverbial conjunction
%<v%>                     ! Verb

%<iv%>                    ! Intransitive
%<tv%>                    ! Transitive

%<stat%>                  ! Stative forms

%<neut%>                  ! Neutral aspect
%<prog%>                  ! Progressive aspect

%<aor%>                   ! Non-future
%<fut%>                   ! Future
%<intn%>                  ! Intentional
%<cond%>                  ! Conditional

%<inf%>                   ! Infinitive
%<perf%>                  ! Perfect
%<hab%>                   ! Habitual

%<gna_sim%>               ! Simultaneous converb
%<gna_ant%>               ! Anterior temporal converb (temporal sequence)
%<gna_res%>               ! Anterior temporal converb (consequence)

%<approx%>                ! Approximative
%<ints%>                  ! Intensifier
%<ints2%>                 ! Intensifier 2
%<ap%>                    ! Antipassive
%<ap2%>                   ! Antipassive
%<caus%>                  ! Causative
%<punct%>                 ! Punctual
%<dim%>                   ! Diminutive (verbal)
%<aug%>                   ! Augmentative (verbal)
%<res%>                   ! Resultative
%<rev%>
%<purp%>                  ! Purposive
%<consume%>
%<utilit%>
%<vrblz%>                 ! Verb deriving suffix
%<vrblz2%>                ! Verb deriving suffix 2
%<desid%>                 ! Desiderative
%<iter%>                  ! Iterative
%<coop_s%>                ! Collective S
%<coop_o%>                ! Collective O
%<dur%>                   ! Durative
%<inch%>                  ! Inchoative
%<inch2%>                 ! Inchoative 2
%<compl%>                 ! Completive



%<s_sg1%>                 ! Subject, 1st person singular
%<s_sg2%>                 ! Subject, 2nd person singular
%<s_sg3%>                 ! Subject, 3rd person singular
%<s_pl1%>                 ! Subject, 1st person plural
%<s_pl2%>                 ! Subject, 2nd person plural
%<s_pl3%>                 ! Subject, 3rd person plural


%<pl%>                    ! Plural
%<sg%>                    ! Singular

%<sing%>                  ! Singulative

%<aa%>                    ! Animates

%<def%>                   ! Definite

%<abl%>                   ! Ablative
%<abs%>                   ! Absolutive
%<ori%>                   ! Orientative
%<erg%>                   ! Ergative
%<all%>                   ! Allative
%<ess%>                   ! Essive [Equative]
%<loc%>                   ! Locative

%<ine%>                   ! Inessive
%<subst%>                 ! Substantive
%<per%>                   ! Perlative
%<com%>                   ! Comitative
%<assoc%>                 ! Associative
%<prv%>                   ! Privative

%<nmzr%>                  ! Nominalizer

%<px1sg%>                 ! 1sg possessor
%<px2sg%>                 ! 2sg possessor
%<px3sg%>                 ! 3sg possessor
%<px1pl%>                 ! 1pl possessor
%<px2pl%>                 ! 2pl possessor
%<px3pl%>                 ! 3pl possessor

%<poss%>                  ! Possessor

%<1sg%>                   ! 1sg possessed
%<2sg%>                   ! 2sg possessed
%<3sg%>                   ! 3sg possessed
%<1pl%>                   ! 1pl possessed
%<2pl%>                   ! 2pl possessed
%<3pl%>                   ! 3pl possessed

%<top%>                   ! Spatial derivations
%<side%>
%<edge%>

%<dim%>
%<aug%>
%<coop%>
%<prtt%>                  ! Part of

%<pers%>                  ! Personal pronoun
%<itg%>                   ! Interrogative pronoun
%<ind%>                   ! Indicative?
%<dem%>                   ! Demonstrative pronoun
%<quant%>                 ! Quantifier pronoun
%<p2%>                    ! First person
%<p2%>                    ! Second person
%<p3%>                    ! Third person

%{Æ%}                     ! э or а
%{T%}                     ! latin; erg & com т ot 0
%{G%}                     ! all & abl; г/й/э
%{ы%}                     ! Epenthetic schwa: ы or 0
%{и%}                     ! For plural: и or 0
%{N%}                     ! allophones of ng
%{R%}                     ! р or н
%{I%}                     ! и or й in suffixes

%{⁺ⱽᴴ%}                   ! Trigger for dominant harmony
%{·%}                     ! Trigger for stem-final vowel deletion
%{°%}                     ! Trigger for stem-final vowel reduction
%{☭%}                     ! Trigger for loan word phonology

%>                        ! Morpheme boundary

LEXICON Root

!Temp ;
Case-prefixes ;
Nouns ;
Adverbs ;
Interjections ;
Participles ;
Conjunctions ;
Miscellaneous ;
Punctuation ;

LEXICON Case-prefixes

@P.CASE.com@:@P.CASE.com@г%{Æ%}%> NOMINALS ;
@P.CASE.assoc@:@P.CASE.assoc@га%> NOMINALS ;
@P.CASE.prv@:@P.CASE.prv@%{Æ%}%> NOMINALS ;


LEXICON NOMINALS
: Nouns ;


LEXICON CASES-ANIM

@D.CASE@%<aa%>%<pl%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}нти # ;
@D.CASE@%<aa%>%<sg%>%<erg%>%<def%>:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}н%{Æ%} # ;
@D.CASE@%<aa%>%<pl%>%<erg%>%<def%>:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}рык # ;
@D.CASE@%<aa%>%<sg%>%<loc%>%<def%>:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}н%{Æ%} # ;
@D.CASE@%<aa%>%<pl%>%<loc%>%<def%>:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}рык # ;
@D.CASE@%<aa%>%<pl%>%<all%>%<def%>:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}рыкы%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} # ;
@D.CASE@%<aa%>%<all%>%<def%>:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}на # ;
@D.CASE@%<aa%>%<ess%>:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}н # ;
%<aa%>:%>%{ы%}р CASES-OBL ;




LEXICON CASES-OBL                             !!

@D.CASE@%<pl%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}т%{и%} # ;
@D.CASE@%<erg%>:@D.CASE@%>%{T%}%{Æ%} # ;
@D.CASE@%<ess%>:@D.CASE@%>у # ;
@D.CASE@%<loc%>:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}к # ;
@D.CASE@%<all%>:@D.CASE@%>%{G%}ты%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} # ;
@D.CASE@%<abl%>:@D.CASE@%>%{G%}%{ы%}п%{ы%}%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} # ;
@D.CASE@%<ori%>:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}гйит # ;
@D.CASE@%<ine%>:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}чыку # ;
@D.CASE@%<per%>:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}йэквэ%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} # ;
@D.CASE@%<sub%>:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}йиӈкы # ;

! circumfixes
@R.CASE.com@%<com%>:@R.CASE.com@%>%{T%}%{Æ%} # ;
@R.CASE.assoc@%<assoc%>:@R.CASE.assoc@%>%{ы%}ма%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} # ;
@R.CASE.prv@%<prv%>:@R.CASE.prv@%>%{ы%}к%{Æ%} # ;




LEXICON N-Ia-AATGYR                                   ! bare stem

@D.CASE@%<n%>%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@ # ;
%<n%>: CASES-OBL ;
%<n%>: CASES-ANIM ;




LEXICON N-Ia-JYNYR-ABS                                ! bare stem with n/ng alteration

@D.CASE@%<n%>%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@ # ;


LEXICON N-Ib-ANGKY                                   ! stem-final vowel reduction

@D.CASE@%<n%>%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@%{°%} # ;
%<n%>: CASES-OBL ;
%<n%>: CASES-ANIM ;




LEXICON N-Ic-AJKOL                                   ! stem-final vowel deletion

@D.CASE@%<n%>%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@%{·%} # ;
%<n%>: CASES-OBL ;
%<n%>: CASES-ANIM ;




LEXICON N-Ic-EJNETKUNEN-ABS                          ! vowel deletion with n/ng alteration

@D.CASE@%<n%>%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@%{·%} # ;


LEXICON N-IIa-VIIL-ABS                               ! full reduplication

@D.CASE@%<n%>%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@ # ;


LEXICON N-IIb-VAJP-ABS                               ! partial reduplication

@D.CASE@%<n%>%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@ # ;


LEXICON N-III-AVYNRAL                                   ! n absolutive

@D.CASE@%<n%>%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}н # ;
%<n%>: CASES-OBL ;
%<n%>: CASES-ANIM ;




LEXICON N-IV-ARAPA                                   ! ngy absolutive

@D.CASE@%<n%>%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}ӈы # ;
%<n%>: CASES-OBL ;
%<n%>: CASES-ANIM ;




LEXICON N-IV-QORA-ABS                                ! qora-qaa

@D.CASE@%<n%>%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}ӈы # ;


LEXICON N-Vv-AVEEN                                   ! irregular; в-oblique

@D.CASE@%<n%>%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@ # ;
%<n%>:в CASES-OBL ;
%<n%>:в CASES-ANIM ;

LEXICON Nouns
вэԓыткъоԓявыԓ:вэԓыткъоԓявыԓ N-Ia-AATGYR ;    ! торговец, продавец
иʼнныпъи:иʼнныпъи N-Ia-AATGYR ;    ! гарпун
ӄаатъоԓ:ӄаатъоԓ N-Ia-AATGYR ;    ! оленье мясо
мымыԓ:мымыԓ N-Ia-AATGYR ;    ! вошь
рырамав:рырамав N-Ia-AATGYR ;    ! табак, приготовленный для курения (покрошенный)
ыʼттъыӄонагтэ:ыʼттъыӄонагтэ N-Ia-AATGYR ;    ! зимние штаны из собачьих шкур
йыӈыр:йыӈыр N-Ia-JYNYR-ABS ;    ! (2) высокий обрывистый берег
ԓиӈыԓ:ԓиӈыԓ N-Ia-JYNYR-ABS ;    ! голубика
вопӄы:вопӄа N-Ib-ANGKY ;    ! лось
гопӄы:гопӄа N-Ib-ANGKY ;    ! лось
кырымынты:кырымынт%{Æ%} N-Ib-ANGKY ;    ! трёхгодовалый олень (самец)
ӄэчыӄы:ӄ%{Æ%}чыӄ%{Æ%} N-Ib-ANGKY ;    ! моржонок
нэнэны:н%{Æ%}н%{Æ%}н%{Æ%} N-Ib-ANGKY ;    ! ребёнок
панваԓрыркы:панваԓрырка N-Ib-ANGKY ;    ! морж двух лет
таӄъы:таӄъа N-Ib-ANGKY ;    ! запас в дорогу
чымӈарыркы:чымӈарырка N-Ib-ANGKY ;    ! старый морж-самец
гитэнэӈ:гит%{Æ%}н%{Æ%}ӈ%{Æ%} N-Ic-AJKOL ;    ! бинокль, подзорная труба
кэвэткунэӈ:к%{Æ%}в%{Æ%}ткун%{Æ%}ӈ%{Æ%} N-Ic-AJKOL ;    ! рубанок
ԓеваԓытконаӈ:ԓеваԓытконаӈа N-Ic-AJKOL ;    ! флаг
ойпытконаӈ:ойпытконаӈа N-Ic-AJKOL ;    ! 1) прочищалка; 2) примусная иголка
рэԓӄиинэӈ:р%{Æ%}ԓӄиин%{Æ%}ӈ%{Æ%} N-Ic-AJKOL ;    ! маленькие сани для перевозки жердей и стоек яранги
тыныԓвэнаӈ:тыныԓвэнаӈа N-Ic-AJKOL ;    ! пила
умэк:ум%{Æ%}к%{Æ%} N-Ic-AJKOL ;    ! кружок, группа
чиԓимуӄ:чиԓимуӄ%{Æ%} N-Ic-AJKOL ;    ! 1) стрихнин; 2) отрава
эʼйӈэвыткунэн:эʼйӈэвыткунэн N-Ic-EJNETKUNEN-ABS ;    ! * рожок; труба (музыкальный инструмент)
эʼйӈэткунэн:эʼйӈэткунэн N-Ic-EJNETKUNEN-ABS ;    ! * гудок (звук)
иԓыиԓ:иԓыиԓ N-IIa-VIIL-ABS ;    ! дождь
ԓымԓым:ԓымԓым N-IIa-VIIL-ABS ;    ! (2) 1) что-л. запасное; 2) пара; 3) вторая жена
тъыԓтъыԓ:тъыԓтъыԓ N-IIa-VIIL-ABS ;    ! боль
вэԓивэԓ:вэԓивэԓ N-IIb-VAJP-ABS ;    ! застывший тюлений жир
кыргыкыр:кыргыкыр N-IIb-VAJP-ABS ;    ! 1) изношенное платье; 2) старая оболочка яранги
ӄыптыӄып:ӄыптыӄып N-IIb-VAJP-ABS ;    ! (2) гуменник (порода гусей)
ԓымгыԓым:ԓымгыԓым N-IIb-VAJP-ABS ;    ! капюшон
мыԓгымыԓ:мыԓгымыԓ N-IIb-VAJP-ABS ;    ! 1) дёрн; 2) торф
нутэнут:нутэнут N-IIb-VAJP-ABS ;    ! 1) земля; 2) страна; 3) тундра
риԓӄыриԓ:риԓӄыриԓ N-IIb-VAJP-ABS ;    ! 1) «маняло» (блюдо из содержимого оленьего желудка); 2) каша
тумгытум:тумгытум N-IIb-VAJP-ABS ;    ! товарищ
вэчоквын:вэчок%{ы%}в N-III-AVYNRAL ;    ! головной убор, закрывающий только уши
йыӈоткогыргын:йыӈоткогыр%{ы%}г N-III-AVYNRAL ;    ! обоняние
ӄырирыткуԓьын:ӄырирыткуԓь N-III-AVYNRAL ;    ! сыщик
ӈэгйиквин:ӈ%{Æ%}гйикви N-III-AVYNRAL ;    ! хребет (горный)
рыйыԓгаквыԓгыгыргын:рыйыԓгаквыԓгыгыр%{ы%}г N-III-AVYNRAL ;    ! связь
тыӄэчгытратгыргын:тыӄэчгытратгыр%{ы%}г N-III-AVYNRAL ;    ! блеск
ыʼтйыръын:ыʼтйыръ N-III-AVYNRAL ;    ! команда байдары
миԓгын:миԓгыԓг N-III-AVYNRAL ;    ! * огонь
ёроӈы:ёро N-IV-ARAPA ;    ! спальное помещение в яранге (меховой полог)
кукэӈы:кук%{Æ%} N-IV-ARAPA ;    ! котёл, кастрюля
ӄэмэӈы:ӄ%{Æ%}м%{Æ%} N-IV-ARAPA ;    ! 1) деревянное блюдо для еды; 2) мелкая посуда
мэйӈырыпэӈы:м%{Æ%}йӈырып%{Æ%} N-IV-ARAPA ;    ! молот
рыпэӈы:рып%{Æ%} N-IV-ARAPA ;    ! 1) каменный молот; 2) молоток
таԓяпаткокаӈы:таԓяпаткока N-IV-ARAPA ;    ! посуда для варки раздробленных оленьих костей
титиӈы:тити N-IV-ARAPA ;    ! иголка
ыпаӈы:ыпа N-IV-ARAPA ;    ! 1) бульон; 2) суп
ӄораӈы:ӄора N-IV-QORA-ABS ;    ! олень
акватын:акватын%{ы%} N-Vv-AVEEN ;    ! место отправления
мыгъян:мыгъян%{ы%} N-Vv-AVEEN ;    ! 1) большинство; 2) большая часть
йынрэтԓян:йынрэтԓян N-Ia-AATGYR ;    ! искра
аʼнэԓён:аʼнэԓён%{ы%} N-Vv-AVEEN ;    ! место, где удят рыбу
йъаԓӄын:йъаԓӄын%{ы%} N-Vv-AVEEN ;    ! 1) сырое место; 2) жидкая грязь; 3) слякоть
ԓьотковакаӈын:ԓьотковакаӈын%{ы%} N-Vv-AVEEN ;    ! избирательный пункт
овэчвыян:овэчвыян%{ы%} N-Vv-AVEEN ;    ! площадка для игры
расӄэвъян:расӄэвъян%{ы%} N-Vv-AVEEN ;    ! вход
гиԓгиԓ:гиԓгиԓ N-IIa-VIIL-ABS ;    ! льдина
кэвкэв:к%{Æ%}вк%{Æ%}в N-IIa-VIIL-ABS ;    ! 1) хрящ; 2) дыхательное горло
мэԓмэԓ:м%{Æ%}ԓм%{Æ%}ԓ N-IIa-VIIL-ABS ;    ! хорошая погода
нымным:нымным N-Ia-AATGYR ;    ! селение
тамтам:тамтам N-IIa-VIIL-ABS ;    ! 1) шишка; 2) бородавка
ӄэйыӄэй:ӄ%{Æ%}йыӄ%{Æ%}%{G%} N-IIa-VIIL-ABS ;    ! 1) детёныш кита; 2) птенец
